Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB713.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4307(g) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4307. Use and display of illuminated signs.* * *(f.2) Public transportation vehicles.--A public transportation vehicle may carry on the rear or side of the vehicle illuminated signs, or surfaces designed to be illuminated signs, placed so as not to interfere with the vision of the driver through the rear window, if any, of the vehicle. Illuminated signs, or surfaces designed to be illuminated signs, so placed shall be of a size and type designed not to interfere with or unduly distract drivers of other vehicles on the <--123456789101112131415161718 highway. The sign or surface shall include features that enhance road safety, including enhanced turn signals and brake lights, by connecting the sign or surface to a vehicle operation indicator. The sign or surface shall be able to communicate with the public through real-time, geofenced and global positioning system enabled technology by providing information and advertising to the public, including public service announcements and emergency alerts. The size and placement of the sign or surface must receive approval of the department or be a type approved by the department prior to use on the vehicle.(F.2) PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION VEHICLES.--(1) A PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION VEHICLE MAY CARRY ON THE REAR OR SIDE OF THE VEHICLE ILLUMINATED SIGNS, OR SURFACES DESIGNED TO BE ILLUMINATED SIGNS THAT ARE COMPLIANT WITH ALL APPLICABLE FEDERAL LAWS AND REGULATIONS, PLACED SO AS NOT TO INTERFERE WITH THE VISION OF THE DRIVER THROUGH THE REAR WINDOW, IF ANY, OF THE VEHICLE. ILLUMINATED SIGNS, OR SURFACES DESIGNED TO BE ILLUMINATED SIGNS, SO PLACED SHALL BE OF A SIZE AND TYPE DESIGNED NOT TO INTERFERE WITH OR UNDULY DISTRACT DRIVERS OF OTHER VEHICLES ON THE HIGHWAY. THE SIGN OR SURFACE SHALL INCLUDE FEATURES THAT ENHANCE ROAD SAFETY, INCLUDING ENHANCED TURN SIGNALS AND BRAKE LIGHTS, BY CONNECTING THE SIGN OR SURFACE TO A VEHICLE OPERATION INDICATOR. THE SIGN OR SURFACE SHALL BE ABLE TO COMMUNICATE WITH THE PUBLIC THROUGH REAL-TIME, GEOFENCED AND GLOBAL POSITIONING SYSTEM ENABLED TECHNOLOGY BY PROVIDING INFORMATION AND ADVERTISING TO THE PUBLIC, INCLUDING PUBLIC SERVICE ANNOUNCEMENTS AND EMERGENCY ALERTS.(2) THE SIZE AND PLACEMENT OF THE SIGN OR SURFACE MUST 20250SB0713PN1152 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RECEIVE APPROVAL OF THE DEPARTMENT OR BE A TYPE APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT PRIOR TO USE ON THE VEHICLE. WITHIN 180 DAYS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE GUIDELINES REGARDING THE CRITERIA AND PROCESS FOR APPROVAL. THE SECRETARY SHALL TRANSMIT NOTICE OF THE ISSUANCE OF THE GUIDELINES TO THE LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE BUREAU FOR PUBLICATION IN THE NEXT AVAILABLE ISSUE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Food delivery vehicle." A vehicle engaged in the transportation or conveyance of food products or items from their place of origin or production to a place of delivery. The vehicle may make intermittent stops that are customary in the routine conduct of the business for which the transportation occurs."Illuminated decal." A battery-powered device measuring no greater than six inches in width and six inches in height with an illumination source not designed to project light beyond the vehicle, but only to provide backlighting for a graphic."Public transportation vehicle." A vehicle used for the purpose of p ublic passenger transportation or a transportation system under 74 Pa.C.S. Chs. 15 (relating to sustainable mobility options) and 17 (relating to metropolitan transportation authorities) and operated by, or under an agreement with, a public entity, including an airport, a port authority, a public transit agency, a State-owned institution or a State-related institution or another Federal, State, county or local government entity or agency. The term includes a bus, AS 20250SB0713PN1152 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DEFINED UNDER 74 PA.C.S. § 1503 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS) AND OPERATED BY, OR UNDER AN AGREEMENT WITH, A LOCAL TRANSPORTATION ORGANIZATION AS DEFINED UNDER 74 PA.C.S. § 1503. THE TERM INCLUDES A BUS, MOTOR VEHICLE OR SHUTTLE VEHICLE, light rail or a train. The term does not include a school bus or a vehicle used for charter or sightseeing services.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0713PN1152 - 4 - 1234567